California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
-------------------------------------------

6832.

(a) The mayor of the municipality in which is located the largest proportion in value of the land within the district, or any chairperson of any of the boards of supervisors of the counties in which the district is located, may call meetings of the board of election.

(b) This section does not apply to the Sacramento-Yolo Port District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6833.

Each commissioner shall, within ten days of his appointment and before entering upon the discharge of the duties of his office, take and subscribe to an oath or affirmation before an officer authorized by law to administer oaths, that he will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of California, and will faithfully discharge the duties of his office according to the best of his ability. The oath or affirmation shall be filed in the office of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6834.

A vacancy on the board shall be filled by the body which appointed the member whose office is vacated, and the newly appointed member shall hold his office for the unexpired term.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6835.

A person shall not be appointed a member of the board who is not, at the time of his appointment, a taxpayer within the district and who has not resided within the district for at least one year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6835.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not be ineligible for appointment to the board because he or she is an elected official or employee of an appointing authority to the board. The appointment of a person to the office of the board shall not be deemed incompatible with being an elected official or employee of an appointing authority to the board, and shall not prevent an elected official or employee so appointed from acting on a proposal before the board affecting the appointing authority. Any regulation providing for the disqualification of a person for that reason is null and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6836.

The members of the board shall serve without salary or compensation, but are entitled to necessary traveling expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6837.

The term of office of each member of the board is four years from the time of his appointment, except that the first appointed chairman holds office for two years, and the remaining members shall classify themselves by lot, so that they hold office respectively for one, two, three, and four years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6838.

The chairman is the presiding officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

6839.

The first meeting of the board shall be held within ten days of the appointment of the chairman. The board shall make its own rules of procedure and determine the place and time of its meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6840.

The board shall select one of its members as chairperson and select one of its members as vice chairperson, who shall preside in the absence of the chairperson, and it may provide for and select the officers it deems necessary to conduct the affairs of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 876, Sec. 11.4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

6841.

A corporation may be selected as treasurer or the board may provide that the duties of the treasurer shall be performed by the county treasurer of the county in which the district or the greater portion is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6843.

The fiscal year of a district shall begin on the first day of July of each year and shall end on the thirtieth day of June of the following year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6844.

The board shall annually file a report of the affairs and financial condition of the district for the preceding year with the governing body of every county or city, all or part of which is included in the district. This report shall show the sources of all receipts and the purposes of all disbursements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Jurisdiction and Powers of the Board [6860. - 6869.]

6860.

The powers of a district established pursuant to this part shall be exercised by the board, by ordinance or resolution passed by a majority vote of the board.

All ordinances shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation, printed or published in one of the counties in which the district is situated, at least five days before final passage.

All franchises and leases for a period of more than 10 years, to be valid, shall be authorized by ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 280.)
-------------------------------------------

6860.5.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6861.

Any grant of a franchise or lease of property of the district shall not be for a longer period than 50 years. Notwithstanding anything herein contained, a district may grant to any common carrier by rail a franchise to operate equipment over any belt railroad, or part thereof, of the district for so long as the district shall own such railroad, and such franchise need not provide for readjustment of compensation therefor during its term.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

6864.

The district, may itself, without letting contracts therefor, do such work and make such improvements as are necessary. The work shall be done under the supervision and direction of its officers or employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

6866.

An officer of the district, and any of its employees, shall not be interested directly or indirectly in any contract or transaction with the district or become surety for the performance of any contract made with or for the district upon bonds given to the district. An officer or employee of the district shall not receive any commission or thing of value, or derive any profit, benefit, or advantage directly or indirectly from or by reason of any dealings with or service for the district by himself or others, except as lawful compensation as such officer or employee. The violation of the provisions of this section by any such officer or employee works a forfeiture of his office or employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6867.

The board may prescribe rules and regulations pertaining to the selection of officers and employees of the district, other than the auditor. It shall also provide the method of selecting such officers and employees and establish appropriate salary ranges for all officers and employees of the district except the auditor. The term of each officer appointed by the board is during its pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

6868.

The board may adopt and carry into effect a contract or contracts of group insurance or a system of group annuities or both for the benefit of such of the officers and employees of the district as accept the same and who have authorized the board to make deductions from their compensation for the payment of a portion of the premium thereon. Contracts of group insurance or systems of group annuities which include benefits to dependents of officers and employees are contracts of group insurance or systems of group annuities for the benefit of officers and employees for the purpose of this section. The board may make such deductions and may pay the remainder of such premiums from any funds of the district not required to be devoted to a specific purpose. The board may pay such portions of the premiums thereon or attributable thereto as it determines to be advisable. The board may arrange or contract for a contract or contracts of group insurance or a system of group annuities or both with any public agency or any insurance company or agent authorized by or pursuant to law to transact such business within this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

6869.

(a) In lieu of the benefits afforded pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code, the district may agree to provide workers’ compensation benefits to its stevedore employees in amounts, and under such conditions, as would be payable to stevedore employees of private employers pursuant to the Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act (33 U.S.C. 901, et seq.).

(b) Such an agreement shall be binding upon the parties only if it is in writing and signed by the employee and by a representative of the district. It shall acknowledge, in writing, that the benefits agreed upon are authorized by this section and are expressly in lieu of any benefits available under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and Division 4.7 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Labor Code.

(c) All claims for benefits against the district which are authorized by this section shall be determined pursuant to law and the rules and regulations of the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board. To the fullest extent possible, the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board shall attempt to apply the Longshoremen’s and Harbor Workers’ Compensation Act to employees covered by this section in the same manner as applicable to private employees.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 11779 of the Insurance Code or any other provision of law, the State Compensation Insurance Fund may provide insurance coverage for the benefits authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. District Powers [6890. - 6910.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [6890. - 6910.]

6890.

Any district created pursuant to this part is a public corporation created for municipal purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6891.

It has perpetual succession.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6892.

It may sue and be sued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6893.

It may adopt a seal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6894.

It may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease or otherwise acquire and hold and enjoy and lease or dispose of, real and personal property of every kind, within or without the district, necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property, within or without the district, when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

6894.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 6894, the board of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District shall not do any of the following:

(a) Sell or dismantle the Deepwater Channel or the North Terminal Property without the prior consent of the City of Sacramento, the County of Sacramento, and the County of Yolo.

(b) Sell or lease for nonmaritime purposes, land in excess of 10 acres located north of Southport Parkway and west of Lake Washington, unless, prior to executing a sale or lease, the board makes a written finding, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the proposed sale or lease is necessary to maintain the financial viability of the port.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6894.2.

(a) Moneys in the Riverfront Enhancement Fund, created by the Joint Port Governance Agreement dated January 15, 2006, shall be expended exclusively on projects related to the Sacramento and American Rivers, including tributaries and fluvial features, encompassed within the Counties of Sacramento and Yolo. Projects may include, but are not limited to, those of regional significance; capital improvements on riverfronts; maintenance and operation of riverfronts, waterways, and parkways; and conservation and environmental studies and projects.

(b) In order to provide a disincentive for port closure to the host jurisdiction, which would receive properties of the Sacramento-Yolo Port District in event of its closure in accordance with this code, if the Port of Sacramento is closed and liquidated on or after January 15, 2016, and prior to January 15, 2026, the net proceeds from the liquidation shall be distributed to the Riverfront Enhancement Fund, less 10 percent for each year after January 15, 2016, that shall be distributed to the City of West Sacramento.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or prohibit the sale or lease of any property of the Port of Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6895.

A district may acquire, purchase, takeover, construct, maintain, operate, develop, and regulate wharves, docks, warehouses, grain elevators, bunkering facilities, cold storage facilities, belt railroads, floating plants, lighterage, lands, towage facilities, and any and all other facilities, aids, or public personnel, incident to, or necessary for, the operation and development of ports, waterways, and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

6896.

It may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to carry out any of its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

6897.

It may incur indebtedness and issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness for its purposes, and if any bonds issued for port improvement purposes by any part of a district prior to its creation are refunded, the refunding bonds are a lien only upon the lands upon which the refunded bonds were a lien, at the time of the creation of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6898.

It may levy and collect or cause to be levied or collected taxes as in this part provided.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6899.

It has exclusive jurisdiction over, and it may provide for and supervise pilots and the pilotage of sea-going vessels from the end of jurisdiction of existing pilot authorities to points lying upon any navigable waterway project of the United States, entering the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6900.

It may contribute money to the Federal or the State government or to any county in which the district is located or to any city within the district, for the purpose of defraying the whole or a portion of the cost and expenses of work and improvement to be performed, either within or without the territorial limits of the district, by the Federal, State, county or city government, in improving rivers, streams, or in doing other work, if such work will improve navigation and commerce, in or to the navigable waters in the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.

A district may do any work or make any improvement within or without the territorial limits of the district, if the doing of the work or the making of the improvement will aid in the development or the improvement of navigation or commerce to or within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

6901.1.

It may by resolution hold and save harmless the State of California, the Reclamation Board of the State of California, and the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, their officers, agents or employees, from all claims, damages or liability due or incident to the design, construction, operation, repair and maintenance of any waterway project of the United States entering the district or other improvement constructed by or for the district for which the approval of the State Reclamation Board must be obtained, whether the same be caused by negligence of the State or of the officers, agents, employees of the State, or otherwise, and it may levy and collect in the manner provided for the raising of funds under this part such sums as may be required to fulfill any obligation incurred hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 671.)
-------------------------------------------

6902.

A district may enact necessary police regulations providing for control of any waterway project of the United States, entering the district, and it may adopt rules and regulations concerning the construction of wharves, docks, buildings, and improvements of all types.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

6903.

A district may provide for the opening and laying out of streets leading to the waterfront.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

6904.

A district may regulate and control the construction, maintenance, and operation, or use, of all wharves, warehouses, structures, improvements, or appliances used in connection with or for the accommodation and promotion of transportation or navigation on any improvement project of the federal government applying to the main waterway entering the district and also on other navigable streams improved or unimproved which lie within the district, and make and enforce necessary police and sanitary regulations in connection therewith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

6905.

It may fix, regulate, and collect the rates or charges for the use of wharves, warehouses, vessels, railroads and other facilities, structures and appliances owned, controlled or operated by the district, in connection with or for the promotion and accommodation of transportation or navigation and the rates or charges for pilotage and towage.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6906.

It may lay out, plan and establish the general plan and system of harbor and harbor district improvements and modify such plan and prescribe the specifications for such improvements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6907.

It may act as warehousemen, stevedores, lighterers, reconditioners, shippers and reshippers of properties of all kinds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6908.

It may manage the business of the district and promote the maritime and commercial interests by proper advertisement of its advantages, and by the solicitation of business, within or without the district, within other States or in foreign vessels from the end of jurisdiction of existing pilot authorities to points lying upon any navigable waterway project of the United States, entering the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6908.5.

Upon a four-fifths vote of all the members of the board, it may issue negotiable promissory notes bearing interest at a rate of not exceeding 7 percent per annum; provided, however, that said notes shall be payable from revenues and taxes levied for purposes of the district other than the payment of principal and interest on any bonded debt of the district; and provided further, that the maturity date shall not be later than 20 years from the date thereof and that the total aggregate amount of such notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed 1 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district, or if such assessed valuation is not obtainable, 1 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district evidenced by his certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1289.)
-------------------------------------------

6909.

Notwithstanding the enumeration and specific statement herein of particular powers, the district may do and perform all acts and things necessary and appropriate to carry out the purposes of this part and the powers of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6910.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Sacramento-Yolo Port District shall not exercise the power of eminent domain in the County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the County of Yolo, or the County of Solano, without specific authorization respectively from the County of Sacramento, the City of Sacramento, the County of Yolo, or the County of Solano.

(b) This section does not apply to the Sacramento-Yolo Port District if it exercises the power of eminent domain in the City of West Sacramento.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 284, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Bonds [6930. - 6939.17.]



  ARTICLE 1. District Bonds [6930. - 6931.]

6930.

Any district organized pursuant to this part may create a bonded debt pursuant to the provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 4 of Division 4, Title 4 of the Government Code.

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of raising money for use in carrying out any of the powers and purposes of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

6931.

Any bonds issued by any district pursuant to this part are legal investments for all trust funds, and for the funds of all insurers, banks, both commercial and savings, and trust companies, and for the State school funds, and whenever any money or funds may, by law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts or municipalities in this State, such money or funds may be invested in bonds of a district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County and Municipal Bonds [6935. - 6935.]

6935.

Whenever, upon the creation of a district, any municipality therein or any county in which the district is located, which has theretofore authorized or incurred a bonded indebtedness for any work or improvement for which the district may incur a bonded debt, and the municipality or county thereafter sells the bonds or any portion thereof, the proceeds of the sale, may, upon the order of the appropriate board of supervisors or city council, be paid by the custodian into the treasury of the district. They shall be applied by the board, exclusively to the purposes for which the bonds were authorized by the municipal corporation or the county issuing them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Revenue Bonds [6936. - 6939.3.]

6936.

Pursuant to this article a district may create a revenue bond indebtedness for the acquisition and construction, or acquisition or construction of any improvements or property or facilities contained within its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

6937.

The issuance of said bonds shall be authorized by ordinance adopted by five-sevenths of all the members of the board, to take effect upon its publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1195, Sec. 18.1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6938.

The secretary shall publish said ordinance once in a newspaper of general circulation printed in said district, and if there is none, then in such newspaper published in one of the counties in which said district is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 280.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.

Said ordinance shall specify the total amount, denomination, method of maturity, and the rate or maximum rate of interest of said bonds, and in general terms, the acquisitions and improvements to be constructed thereby; and, in addition, shall contain such other and further provisions as in the judgment of the board are deemed advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.1.

The proceeds of said bonds shall be placed in an account in the treasury of the district to be entitled ________ Port District Revenue Construction Fund No. ________ and used exclusively for the objects and purposes mentioned in the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.3.

Proceedings for the issuance of said bonds shall be had, the board shall have such powers and duties, and the bondholders shall have such rights and remedies, all in substantial accordance with and with like legal effect as provided in Sections 54344 to 54346, inclusive, 54347, 54348, 54350, 54351, 54352, and in Articles 4 (commencing at Section 54400) to 11 (commencing at Section 54660), inclusive, of Chapter 6, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code. As used therein the word “resolution” shall mean ordinance, the word “local agency” shall mean district, and the words “legislative body” shall mean board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 91.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Additional Sacramento-Yolo Port District Bonds [6939.4. - 6939.17.]

6939.4.

Pursuant to this article, the Sacramento-Yolo Port District may also create an additional bonded debt, in addition to all other indebtedness authorized by the provisions of this chapter, up to but not in excess of 1 percent of the assessed value of all taxable real and personal property within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.5.

This bonded indebtedness may be created solely for the purpose of providing funds for the acquisition, construction, improvement, or extension of revenue-producing harbor improvements of a self-liquidating character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.6.

Any bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be authorized by ordinance passed by two-thirds of all of the members of the board. The ordinance shall not become effective until approved by a two-thirds vote of the county supervisors who represent any portion of the territory which is included within the district. Except as provided in this section, an election need not be held within the district, and it is unnecessary to secure the approval of the electors within the district for the issuance of bonds for the purposes and within the limitations of this article.

The ordinance shall become effective 30 days from the date of its passage, unless a petition protesting the ordinance is presented to the board pursuant to Section 9144 of the Elections Code, prior to the effective date of the ordinance. If the petition is timely filed, proceedings for the adoption of the ordinance shall be conducted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 9140) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code, and, as used in these sections, “board of supervisors” means the board of port commissioners, and “county” means the Sacramento-Yolo Port District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 588, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.7.

The bonds of any issue may be issued in one or more series. The bonds of such series shall be payable within 30 years from their date and shall mature serially at such times as may be fixed by the board, but the earliest maturityof the principal of the bonds of any series shall be fixed at a date not more than 10 years from the date of issue of such series.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.8.

The bonds may be issued in such denominations as the board determines, except that no bond shall be of a denomination less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor of a greater denomination than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

The bonds shall be payable on the day and at the place or places fixed in such bonds, with interest at the rate specified in the bonds, which rate shall not be in excess of 6 percent per annum of the face amount, payable annually or semiannually.

The board may provide for redemption of any bonds before maturity at prices and upon terms and conditions determined by it. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital on its face to that effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.9.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, his signature or countersignature is nevertheless as valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office.

Bonds may be issued and sold by the board for not less than their par value and accrued interest to date of delivery, at such times and under such conditions as may be designated by the board.

The proceeds shall be placed in the treasury of the district to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the objects and purposes mentioned in the ordinance. Said purposes may include bond interest during construction and for a period not to exceed one year after completion of construction, and creation of a reserve fund to secure payment of bond interest and principal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.10.

The form of the bonds shall be prescribed by the board and they shall be signed by the officer or officers that the board designates. The coupons appertaining to the bonds shall be numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the facsimile signature of the officer or officers that the board has designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.11.

The income and revenue derived or to be realized from the harbor improvement acquired, constructed, improved or extended from the proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited in a special fund and kept separate and apart from all other revenues of the district. It shall be applied, firstly, to the creation of an interest fund, herein designated as “interest fund,” for the payment of the annual interest due or to become due upon the bonds during the next ensuing fiscal year and before the time for the fixing of the next general tax levy in the counties in which the district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.12.

The special fund shall be applied, secondly, to the creation of a sinking fund, herein designated as “sinking fund,” to provide for the payment of the principal of the bonds at or before their maturity date or dates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.13.

Any additional revenues over and above the amounts required to be deposited in the interest fund and the sinking fund, may be deposited in an operation fund, herein designated as “operation fund,” to be applied to the costs of operation and maintenance, including reasonable repairs, depreciation and capital improvements of the particular revenue-producing harbor improvement acquired, constructed, improved or extended by the issuance and sale of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.14.

Surplus revenues in the operation fund may be deposited either in the interest fund or any reserve fund created to secure any bonds or in the sinking fund, but money allocated to the interest fund or the sinking fund shall not be transferred to any other fund or used for any other purpose than the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon so long as the bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.15.

The board, in and by the ordinance authorizing the issuance of the bonds, shall hypothecate and allocate all of the revenues to be realized from the revenue-producing harbor improvement to be acquired or constructed, improved or extended from the proceeds of the bonds to the payment of both principal and interest.

The allocation and hypothecation is irrevocable until all bonds and the accrued interest thereon are paid.

The allocation and hypothecation shall be made in each case for the exclusive benefit of the bonds to be issued for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, improving or extending the particular revenue-producing harbor improvement, and as additional security for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds.

But the allocation and hypothecation do not constitute the exclusive source of payment. The bonds constitute general obligations of the district and both principal and interest may be paid from any money or sources of revenue of any kind, including taxes, on hand and available for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.16.

Whenever the revenues of the district are, or in the opinion of the board will be insufficient to provide for the payment in full of the principal or interest on the bonds, the board may, and if the revenues in the interest fund are insufficient to meet the next ensuing fiscal year’s interest on the bonds issued and then outstanding or if the moneys in the sinking fund are insufficient to pay or provide for the payment of any bonds maturing during the next ensuing fiscal year, or if any reserve fund has been drawn upon and not replenished it shall cause a tax to be levied and collected, upon all of the taxable property in the district, sufficient to meet all sums coming due for principal and interest on the bonds during the next ensuing fiscal year and before the time for fixing the next general tax levy in the county in which the district is located or to replenish such reserve fund.

The tax shall be levied and collected annually in the manner provided by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6940) of this part, and shall be in addition to all other taxes authorized to be levied and collected. When collected, the tax shall not be used for any purpose other than the payment of the bonds and the accruing interest thereon or the replenishment of such reserve fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

6939.17.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that because of the unique, complex problems existing with respect to the Sacramento-Yolo Port District, as a large inland port district, it is necessary that special legislation be enacted to authorize additional, limited financing provisions for said port district, and that a general law cannot be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Finances and Taxation [6940. - 6963.]



  ARTICLE 1. Levy, Assessment and Collection of Taxes [6940. - 6944.]

6940.

On or before June first of each year, the port director shall submit to the board a detailed statement of the money required for the ensuing fiscal year for the purpose of conducting the business of the district. There shall be submitted with the estimate such data and schedules as the board may require.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6941.

Annually on or before the date set for the consideration of the budget by the board of supervisors of each county in which the district, or any portion thereof, is located, the board of each district shall furnish to the board of supervisors of each county in which the district is situated, an estimate in writing of the amount of money necessary for all purposes by the district during the ensuing fiscal year. Upon approval by the board of supervisors of each county, in which any lands lie within the district, the board of supervisors of each county shall levy a special tax, on all taxable property of the county lying within the district, sufficient in amount to raise the county’s proportionate amount of the sum required.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6942.

The tax shall not exceed the rate of ten cents on each one hundred dollars of the assessed value of all taxable property within the district, exclusive of the amount necessary to be raised by taxes to meet bond interest and redemption. The tax shall be computed, entered upon the tax rolls and collected in the same manner as county taxes are computed, entered and collected. All money so collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the particular district fund and shall be paid to the treasurer of the district upon the order of the board of port commissioners.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

6943.

From the time of the organization of any district until the next succeeding July 1st, or in the event that a district is formed between February 1st and July 1st of any year then until one year from the next succeeding July 1st after the formation thereof, the district may incur indebtedness for the purpose of operating the port and the district and in the first tax levy, the rate shall be in an amount sufficient to operate the port and the district for the first full fiscal year as well as to pay the obligations incurred as herein provided for.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 563.)
-------------------------------------------

6944.
